Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 12 TEACHERS
33-1280. American Indian languages teaching authorization.

As used in this section, “Indian tribe” is as defined in section 67-4001, Idaho Code.

It is the policy of the state of Idaho to preserve, protect and promote the rights of Indian tribes to use, practice and develop their native languages and to encourage American Indians in the state to use, study and teach their native languages in order to encourage and promote:

The survival of the native language;

Increased student scholarship;

Increased student awareness of the student’s culture and history; and

Increased student success.

The state board of education shall promulgate rules authorizing American Indian languages teachers to teach in the public schools of this state.

Each Indian tribe may establish its own system of designation for individuals qualified to teach that tribe’s native language. In establishing such a system, the tribe shall determine:

The development of an oral and written qualification test;

Which dialects shall be used in the test;

Whether the tribe will standardize the tribe’s writing system;

How the teaching methods will be evaluated in the classroom; and

The period of time for which a tribal designation shall be valid.

Each Indian tribe shall provide to the state board of education the names of those highly and uniquely qualified individuals who have been designated to teach the tribe’s native language.
(5)(a) Each Indian tribe shall provide to the state board of education the names of those highly and uniquely qualified individuals who have been designated to teach the tribe’s native language.

Upon receiving the names of American Indian languages teachers designated by an Indian tribe, the state board of education shall authorize those individuals as American Indian languages teachers in accordance with rules of the board.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state board of education shall not require an American Indian languages teacher who has obtained tribal designation to teach a native language to hold a specific academic degree or to complete a teacher education program.

An American Indian languages teaching authorization shall qualify the authorized individual to accept a teaching position or assignment in any school district of the state that offers or permits courses in an American Indian language.
(7)(a) An American Indian languages teaching authorization shall qualify the authorized individual to accept a teaching position or assignment in any school district of the state that offers or permits courses in an American Indian language.

A holder of an American Indian languages teaching authorization who does not also have a teaching certificate as provided in section 33-1201, Idaho Code, may not teach in a school district of this state any subject other than the American Indian language for which he or she is authorized to teach.

33-1251. Professional standards — Title of act.

33-1271. School districts — Professional employees — Negotiation agreements.

33-1279. Released time for service on state committees and commission.